src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_puasui_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - puásui: # MLO, ok. Trond added Ess, Par forms corr. to MLO's "puásui" forms
    puásui+N+Sg+Nom:  puásui
    puásui+N+Sg+Gen:  poccuu
    puásui+N+Sg+Acc:  poccuu
    puásui+N+Sg+Ill:  poccui
    puásui+N+Sg+Loc:  poccust
    puásui+N+Sg+Com:  poccuin
    puásui+N+Sg+Abe:  poccuuttáá
    puásui+N+Ess:  [puásujin, poccun]
    puásui+N+Par:  [puásujid, poccud]
    puásui+N+Pl+Nom:  poccuuh
    puásui+N+Pl+Gen:  poccui
    puásui+N+Pl+Acc:  poccuid
    puásui+N+Pl+Ill:  poccuid
    puásui+N+Pl+Loc:  poccuin
    puásui+N+Pl+Com:  [poccuiguin, poccuigijn]
    puásui+N+Pl+Abe:  poccuittáá
    
  Noun - almai: # MLO, ok  C_ALMAI
    almai+N+Sg+Nom:  almai
    almai+N+Sg+Gen:  almaa
    almai+N+Sg+Acc:  almaa
    almai+N+Sg+Ill:  [almai, almajân]
    almai+N+Sg+Loc:  almast
    almai+N+Sg+Com:  almain
    almai+N+Sg+Abe:  almaattáá
    almai+N+Ess:  [almajin, alman] # Trond alman
    almai+N+Par:  [almajid, almad] # Trond almad
    almai+N+Pl+Nom:  almaah
    almai+N+Pl+Gen:  almai
    almai+N+Pl+Acc:  almaid
    almai+N+Pl+Ill:  almaid
    almai+N+Pl+Loc:  almain
    almai+N+Pl+Com:  [almaiguin, almaigijn]
    almai+N+Pl+Abe:  almaittáá    

  Noun - puájui: # MLO, ok  C_KUAVSUI
    puájui+N+Sg+Nom:  puájui
    puájui+N+Sg+Gen:  poijuu
    puájui+N+Sg+Acc:  poijuu
    puájui+N+Sg+Ill:  poijui
    puájui+N+Sg+Loc:  poijust
    puájui+N+Sg+Com:  poijuin
    puájui+N+Sg+Abe:  poijuuttáá
    puájui+N+Ess:  [puájujin, poijun] # Trond
    puájui+N+Par:  [puájujid, poijud] # Trond
    puájui+N+Pl+Nom:  poijuuh
    puájui+N+Pl+Gen:  poijui
    puájui+N+Pl+Acc:  poijuid
    puájui+N+Pl+Ill:  poijuid
    puájui+N+Pl+Loc:  poijuin
    puájui+N+Pl+Com:  [poijuiguin, poijuigijn]
    puájui+N+Pl+Abe:  poijuittáá
    
  Noun - suálui: # MLO, ok 
    suálui+N+Sg+Nom:  [suálui, suáloi] #suá´loi to be accepted 
    suálui+N+Sg+Gen:  suolluu
    suálui+N+Sg+Acc:  suolluu
    suálui+N+Sg+Ill:  suollui
    suálui+N+Sg+Loc:  suollust
    suálui+N+Sg+Com:  suolluin
    suálui+N+Sg+Abe:  suolluuttáá
    suálui+N+Ess:  [suálujin, suollun]
    suálui+N+Par:  [suálujid, suollud]
    suálui+N+Pl+Nom:  suolluuh
    suálui+N+Pl+Gen:  suollui
    suálui+N+Pl+Acc:  suolluid
    suálui+N+Pl+Ill:  suolluid
    suálui+N+Pl+Loc:  suolluin
    suálui+N+Pl+Com:  [suolluiguin, suolluigijn]
    suálui+N+Pl+Abe:  suolluittáá

  Noun - čuálgui: # MLO, ok Hist uá-dift C_KUAVSUI
    čuálgui+N+Sg+Nom:  čuálgui
    čuálgui+N+Sg+Gen:  čuolguu
    čuálgui+N+Sg+Acc:  čuolguu
    čuálgui+N+Sg+Ill:  čuolgui
    čuálgui+N+Sg+Loc:  čuolgust
    čuálgui+N+Sg+Com:  čuolguin
    čuálgui+N+Sg+Abe:  čuolguuttáá
    čuálgui+N+Ess:  [čuálgujin, čuolgun] # tt
    čuálgui+N+Par:  [čuálgujid, čuolgud] # tt
    čuálgui+N+Pl+Nom:  čuolguuh
    čuálgui+N+Pl+Gen:  čuolgui
    čuálgui+N+Pl+Acc:  čuolguid
    čuálgui+N+Pl+Ill:  čuolguid
    čuálgui+N+Pl+Loc:  čuolguin
    čuálgui+N+Pl+Com:  [čuolguiguin, čuolguigijn]
    čuálgui+N+Pl+Abe:  čuolguittáá

  Noun - cuábui: # MLO, ok Hist uá-dift
    cuábui+N+Sg+Nom:  cuábui
    cuábui+N+Sg+Gen:  cuobbuu
    cuábui+N+Sg+Acc:  cuobbuu
    cuábui+N+Sg+Ill:  cuobbui
    cuábui+N+Sg+Loc:  cuobbust
    cuábui+N+Sg+Com:  cuobbuin
    cuábui+N+Sg+Abe:  cuobbuuttáá
    cuábui+N+Ess:  [cuábujin, cuobbun]
    cuábui+N+Par:  [cuábujid, cuobbud]
    cuábui+N+Pl+Nom:  cuobbuuh
    cuábui+N+Pl+Gen:  cuobbui
    cuábui+N+Pl+Acc:  cuobbuid
    cuábui+N+Pl+Ill:  cuobbuid
    cuábui+N+Pl+Loc:  cuobbuin
    cuábui+N+Pl+Com:  [cuobbuiguin, cuobbuigijn]
    cuábui+N+Pl+Abe:  cuobbuittáá

  Noun - puárui: # MLO, ok Hist oa-dift
    puárui+N+Sg+Nom:  [puárui, puároi] # puá´roi: to be accepted
    puárui+N+Sg+Gen:  porruu
    puárui+N+Sg+Acc:  porruu
    puárui+N+Sg+Ill:  porrui
    puárui+N+Sg+Loc:  porrust
    puárui+N+Sg+Com:  porruin
    puárui+N+Sg+Abe:  porruuttáá
    puárui+N+Ess:  [puárujin, porrun] # puá´rojin, to be accepted
    puárui+N+Par:  [puárujid, porrud] # puá´rojid, to be accepted
    puárui+N+Pl+Nom:  porruuh
    puárui+N+Pl+Gen:  porrui
    puárui+N+Pl+Acc:  porruid
    puárui+N+Pl+Ill:  porruid
    puárui+N+Pl+Loc:  porruin
    puárui+N+Pl+Com:  [porruiguin, porruigijn]
    puárui+N+Pl+Abe:  porruittáá

  Noun - kuávsui: # MLO, ok Hist uá-dift C_KUAVSUI
    kuávsui+N+Sg+Nom:  kuávsui
    kuávsui+N+Sg+Gen:  kuoksuu
    kuávsui+N+Sg+Acc:  kuoksuu
    kuávsui+N+Sg+Ill:  kuoksui
    kuávsui+N+Sg+Loc:  kuoksust
    kuávsui+N+Sg+Com:  kuoksuin
    kuávsui+N+Sg+Abe:  kuoksuuttáá
    kuávsui+N+Ess:  [kuávsujin, kuoksun] # tt
    kuávsui+N+Par:  [kuávsujid, kuoksud] # tt
    kuávsui+N+Pl+Nom:  kuoksuuh
    kuávsui+N+Pl+Gen:  kuoksui
    kuávsui+N+Pl+Acc:  kuoksuid
    kuávsui+N+Pl+Ill:  kuoksuid
    kuávsui+N+Pl+Loc:  kuoksuin
    kuávsui+N+Pl+Com:  [kuoksuiguin, kuoksuigijn]
    kuávsui+N+Pl+Abe:  kuoksuittáá
